District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.32

Eligibility of the uninsured.

To be eligible, an individual shall:

(1)

Be a resident of the District;

(2)

Have a household income that is not more than 350% of the federal poverty level; and

(3)

Not be enrolled in any public or private medical insurance program.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 132, 51 DCR 3688